Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska34-116
Lawful fences; height and spaces.

The fences described in section 34-115 shall be at least four and one-half feet in height; and in the construction of such fences the spaces between the boards, rails, poles, and wires shall not exceed one foot each, measuring from the top.

Laws 1867 (Ter.), § 2, p. 17;

R.S.1913, § 2493;

C.S.1922, § 2432;

C.S.1929, § 34-116;

R.S.1943, § 34-116.

This section was not intended to apply to railroads. Chicago, B. & Q. R. R. Co. v. James, 26 Neb. 188, 41 N.W. 992 (1889).